North Carolina, session 2025, HB877.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The Legislative Services Office shall, by October 15, 2025, working
collaboratively with the State Construction Office and the Department of Administration,
develop a comprehensive process for implementing a demonstration pilot project to select a
third-party childcare operator as the public-private partner (P3) for the project. The process shall
include, at a minimum, (i) the development of a request for proposals to competitively select the
P3 partner to be the operator of the childcare facility, (ii) the basic methodology of scoring the
proposals received to select a P3 partner where that scoring criteria can be expanded to include
additional considerations being proposed a respondent, and (iii) a base P3 contract to be used to
*H877-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
negotiate a final agreement with the selected P3 partner. The Legislative Services Office shall
issue the initial request for proposals no later than January 2, 2026.
The Legislative Services Office shall extend an invitation to participate, as a partner,
to a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina System that is located within the
same county as the demonstration project. If that constituent institution accepts, it may participate
by providing either a site for the facility or a portion of the funding, or some combination thereof.
Based upon the level of participation as mutually agreed by the consistent institution and the
Legislative Services Office, a commensurate share of the childcare spaces shall be made available
on a first priority basis for employees of that constituent institution.
SECTION 1.(b) The Legislative Services Office, in conjunction with the State
Construction Office, shall select a site from available State- or University-owned lands suitable
for the construction of a shell building and shall issue a request for information and a request for
proposal regarding the execution of a ground lease with a third party with evidence supporting
the ability to operate a childcare facility as described in subsection (c) of this section. The ground
lease shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) per month, with a preferred initial term of
at least 10 years. Lease renewals of at least four years may be included in the agreement, provided
that the performance of the lessor is satisfactory to the Legislative Services Office. The third
party selected by the Legislative Services Office shall submit a site plan that will be adapted and
developed for the site and shell building. The third party selected to operate the childcare facility
will be responsible for the upfit of the building, building and site maintenance, utilities, and all
other operating costs. The State may also partner with a constituent institution of The University
of North Carolina in the selection of a University-owned site as described in subsection (a) of
this section.
SECTION 1.(c) The third party selected for the operation of the childcare facility
described in this section shall be able to meet at least all of the following criteria:
(1) Demonstrates the ability and commits to provide childcare rates that are
twenty-five percent (25%) or more below the current market rates for the area
where the facility is to be located using a modified pro forma that eliminates
the cost of land, the cost of site improvements, the cost of utility extensions
and connection, the cost of the shell building and the anticipated costs of
construction loan interest. The respondent with the greatest reduction below
the current market rate shall receive the highest score for this category.
(2) Capable of operating a facility licensed under Chapter 110 of the General
Statutes that will enroll at least 180 children.
(3) Agrees to pay a wage to all childcare providers employed by the facility equal
to at least one hundred eighty percent (180%) of the federal minimum wage,
as of January 1, 2025, for the first year services are provided under the lease
agreement, and an annual increase of at least two and one-half percent (2.5%)
for at least the first four years thereafter, without changing the rates charged
to consumers for a period of at least four years.
(4) Agrees to provide health insurance for all of the full-time employees. For the
purposes of this subdivision, the provision of health insurance means that the
employer pays at least fifty percent (50%) of the premiums for health care
coverage that equals or exceeds the minimum requirements for small group
health benefit plans under State or federal law.
(5) Agrees to provide priority placement for eighty percent (80%) of available
childcare capacity at the site to State employees, including employees of a
constituent institution of The University of North Carolina that partners with
the Legislative Services Office as described in this section.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-5-2, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Legislative Services Office the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in
Page 2 House Bill 877-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used for the childcare pilot program
described in Section 1 of this act. The funds appropriated in this section shall not revert until July
1, 2027.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2025. The remainder of
this act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 877-First Edition Page 3